New York, session 2025-2026, A7735.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 458 of the real property tax law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph 6 to read as follows: 3 (6) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any other 4 provision of law to the contrary, each county, city, town or village 5 may, after public hearing, adopt a local law, ordinance or resolution 6 allowing the assessor to accept retroactive applications for the 7 exemption set forth in this section from any veteran to whom an 8 exemption has already been granted pursuant to the provisions of this 9 section, provided, however, that said veteran would have been entitled 10 to such exemption if such veteran had filed an application for exemption 11 by the appropriate taxable status date and that such applications may 12 only be accepted for assessment rolls prepared on the basis of taxable 13 status dates occurring no more than three years preceding the date of 14 such application. 15 § 2. Section 458-a of the real property tax law is amended by adding a 16 new subdivision 3-b to read as follows: 17 3-b. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any other 18 provision of law to the contrary, each county, city, town or village 19 may, after public hearing, adopt a local law, ordinance or resolution 20 allowing the assessor to accept retroactive applications for the 21 exemption set forth in this section from any veteran to whom an 22 exemption has already been granted pursuant to the provisions of this EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01587-03-5 A. 7735--A 2 1 section, provided, however, that said veteran would have been entitled 2 to such exemption if such veteran had filed an application for exemption 3 by the appropriate taxable status date and that such applications may 4 only be accepted for assessment rolls prepared on the basis of taxable 5 status dates occurring no more than three years preceding the date of 6 such application. 7 § 3. Section 458-b of the real property tax law is amended by adding a 8 new subdivision 3-a to read as follows: 9 3-a. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any other 10 provision of law to the contrary, each county, city, town or village 11 may, after public hearing, adopt a local law, ordinance or resolution 12 allowing the assessor to accept retroactive applications for the 13 exemption set forth in this section from any veteran to whom an 14 exemption has already been granted pursuant to the provisions of this 15 section, provided, however, that said veteran would have been entitled 16 to such exemption if such veteran had filed an application for exemption 17 by the appropriate taxable status date and that such applications may 18 only be accepted for assessment rolls prepared on the basis of taxable 19 status dates occurring no more than three years preceding the date of 20 such application. 21 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.